apertium-yid.yid.lexc
LEXICON CNJADV

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON PREADV

%<preadv%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ORD

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ORD-ADJ

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>: ADJ-INFL-ENDINGS ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Conjunctions

אָבער:אָבער CC ; ! "but"
אָדער:אָדער CC ; ! "or"
און:און CC ; ! "and"
סײַ:סײַ CC ; ! "both/and"

אַז:אַז CNJSUB ; ! "that"
אַלס:אַלס CNJSUB ; ! "when"
אַפֿילו:אַפֿילו CNJSUB ; ! "even though; despite"
אױב:אױב CNJSUB ; ! "if"
װי:װי CNJSUB ; ! "how"
װען:װען CNJSUB ; ! "when"
װײַל:װײַל CNJSUB ; ! "because"


LEXICON Adverbs

װוּ:װאו ADV-ITG ; ! "where" ! Dir/LR
װוּ:װוּ ADV-ITG ; ! "where"
װוּהין:װאוהין ADV-ITG ; ! "whither"
װוּהין:װוּהין ADV-ITG ; ! "whither"
װי:װי ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
װען:װען ADV-ITG ; ! "when"

װי:װי PREADV ; ! "how"

אַזױ:אַזױ ADV ; ! "thus"
אַרױס:אַרױס ADV ; ! "out"
אַרײַן:אַרײַן ADV ; ! "in, inside"
אױך:אױך ADV ; ! "also"
אױס:אױס ADV ; ! "over (finished)"
דאָרט:דאָרט ADV ; ! "there"
הײַנט:הײַנט ADV ; ! "today"
מער:מער ADV ; ! "more"
נאָך:נאָך ADV ; ! "still"
נאָך:נאָך PREADV ; ! "still"  ! FIXME: CHECK
נאָר:נאָר PREADV ; ! "only"
נישט:ניט ADV ; ! "not" ! Dir/LR
נישט:נישט ADV ; ! "not"
פֿאַראַן:פֿאַראַן ADV ; ! "there"
צוזאַמען:צוזאַמען ADV ; ! "together"
צוריק:צוריק ADV ; ! "back"
שױן:שױן ADV ; ! "already, yet"

LEXICON Prepositions

אַלס:אַלס PREP ; ! "as"
אַרום:אַרום PREP ; ! "around"
אָן:אָן PREP ; ! "without"
אום:אום PREP ; ! "around; over"
אונטער:אונטער PREP ; ! "under"
איבער:איבער PREP ; ! "over, above; about"
אין:אין PREP-EN ; ! "in"
אױף:אױף PREP-EN ; ! "on, by"
ביז:ביז PREP ; ! "up to, until"
בײַ:בײַ PREP-EN ; ! "у"
דורך:דורך PREP ; ! "through"
זינט:זינט PREP ; ! "since"
זינט:זײַט PREP ; ! "since"
זינט:צײַט PREP ; ! "since"
כּדי:כּדי PREP ; ! "in order (to)"
לעבן:לעבן PREP ; ! "next to"
לעבן:נעבן PREP ; ! "next to"
לױט:לױט PREP ; ! "according to"
מיט:מיט PREP-EN ; ! "with"
נאָך:נאָך PREP-EN ; ! "after"
פֿאַר:פֿאַר PREP-EN ; ! "for, per"
פֿון:פֿון PREP-EN ; ! "of, from"
צו:צו PREP-EN ; ! "to"
צוליב:צוליב PREP ; ! "because of"
צװישן:צװישן PREP ; ! "between"
קעגן:קעגן PREP ; ! "against"
קײן:קײן PREP ; ! "to (+place)"
װי:װי PREP ; ! "like"
װעגן:װעגן PREP ; ! "about"


LEXICON DetRoot

דער:ד DET-DEF-M ; ! "the"
די:ד DET-DEF-F ; ! "the"
דאָס:ד DET-DEF-N ; ! "the"
די:ד DET-DEF-PL ; ! "the"
אַ:אַ DET-INDEF ; ! "a"
אַ:אַן DET-INDEF ; ! "an" ! Dir/LR
קײן:קײן DET-INDEF ; ! "a/an, no, any"

מײַן:מײַן DET-PERS-P1SG ;
דײַן:דײַן DET-PERS-P2SG ;
זײַן:זײַן DET-PERS-P3SGMN ;
איר:איר DET-PERS-P3SGF ;
אונדזער:אונדזער DET-PERS-P1PL ;
אײַער:אײַער DET-PERS-P2PL ;
זײער:זײער DET-PERS-P3PL ;

װעלך:װעלך DET-ITG ; ! "which"
אַלע:אַלע DET-QNT ; ! "all"
אַ% סך:אַ% סך DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
אַ% סך:אַסאַך DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
עטלעכע:עטלעכע DET-QNT ; ! "some (a few)"


LEXICON Pronouns

PRON-P1-SG ;
PRON-P2-SG ;
PRON-P3-SG ;
PRON-P1-PL ;
PRON-P2-PL ;
PRON-P3-PL ;
מען%<prn%>%<pers%>%<impers%>%<nom%>:מען # ;
מען%<prn%>%<pers%>%<impers%>%<nom%>:מע # ;  ! Dir/LR
װאָס%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:װאָס # ;
װאָס%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:װאָס # ;
װאָס%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:װאָס # ;
זיך%<prn%>%<ref%>:זיך # ;

װעלך:װעלך PRON-ITG ; ! "which one (?)"  FIXME: CHECK

גאָרנישט:גאָרנישט PRON-IND ;  ! "nothing"
גאָרנישט:גאָרניט PRON-IND ;   ! Dir/LR
אַלץ:אַלץ PRON-IND ;          ! "everything"
עפּעס:עפּעס PRON-IND ;        ! "something"


LEXICON VerbRoot

%[%-pp%]:גע VerbStems ; ! past participle
VerbStems ; ! other forms

%[%-←on%]%[%-pp%]:אָנגע VerbStems ; ! past participle
%[%-→on%]: VerbStems ; ! other forms
%[%-←on%]:אָנ VerbStems ; ! other forms

LEXICON IrregularVerbs

אָנטאָן%[√on%]:טאָ V-TON-TO ; ! "put on clothes"
אָנטאָן%[√on%]:טו V-TON-TU ; ! "put on clothes"
טאָן:טאָ V-TON-TO ; ! "do"
טאָן:טו V-TON-TU ; ! "do"

זײַן:זײַ V-ZAYN-ZAY ;
זײַן:בי V-ZAYN-BI ;
זײַן:איז V-ZAYN-IZ ;
זײַן:װע V-ZAYN-VE ;
זײַן:זע V-ZAYN-ZE ; ! Dir/LR

האָבן:האָב V-HOBN-HOB ;
האָבן:האָ V-HOBN-HO ;
האָבן:האַ V-HOBN-HA ;

גײן:גאַנג V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "go"
גײן:גײ V-GEYN-GEY ;          ! "go"
גײן:גײע V-GEYN-GEYE ;        ! "go"


LEXICON Auxiliaries

האָבן:האָב VAux-HOBN-HOB ; ! "have"
האָבן:האָ VAux-HOBN-HO ;
האָבן:האַ VAux-HOBN-HA ;

װעל:װעל VAux-VEL-VEL ; ! "will"
װעל:װע VAux-VEL-VE ;

דאַרפֿן:דאַרף VAux-REG ; ! "have to, ought to, must"
זאָלן:זאָל VAux-REG ; ! "should"
קענען:קענ VAux-REG ; ! "can"

LEXICON VerbStems

IrregularVerbs ; 
Auxiliaries ; 

אַרבעטן:אַרבעט V-REG ; ! "work"
אָנהײבן%[√on%]:הױב V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "begin"
אָנהײבן%[√on%]:הײב V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "begin"
בּעטן:בּעט V-STRONG-7 ; ! "ask"
באַקומען:באַקום V-REG-NOPREF ; ! "receive, acquire"
בלײַבן:בליב V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "stay"
בלײַבן:בלײַב V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "stay"
געפֿינען:געפֿין V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "find"
געפֿינען:פֿון V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "find"
דאַרפֿן:דאַרף V-REG ; ! "need, require"
הײסן:הײס V-STRONG-7 ; ! "be called"
זאָגן:זאָג V-REG ; ! "say"
לעבן:לעב V-REG ; ! "live"
מאַכן:מאַך V-REG ; ! "make"
נעמען:נום V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "took"
נעמען:נעם V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "take"
עסן:געס V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "eat"
עסן:עס V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "eat"
פֿאַרלירן:פֿאַרליר V-REG-NOPREF ; ! "lose"
פֿאָרן:פֿאָר V-STRONG-7 ; ! "ride, drive, travel by animal/vehicle"
קומען:קום V-STRONG-7 ; ! "come"
קענען:קענ V-REG ; ! "know"
קױפֿן:קױפֿ V-REG ; ! "buy"
רעדן:רעד V-REG ; ! "speak"
שרײַבן:שריב V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "write"
שרײַבן:שרײַב V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "write"
װערן:װאָר V-STRONG-PP-ONLY ; ! "become"
װערן:װער V-STRONG-NOPP ; ! "become"

LEXICON Adjectives

אַלט:אַלט ADJ-UML ; ! "old"
אַנדער:אַנדער ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "different"
גוט:בעס ADJ-IRREG-COMP ; ! "better/best"
גוט:גוט ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "good"
געבױרן:געבױרן ADJ-BARE ; ! "born"
גרױס:גרױס ADJ-UML ; ! "big"
היסטאָריש:היסטאָריש ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "historical" FIXME: CHECK NO-COMP?
הױפּט:הױפּט ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "head, main"
יונג:יונג ADJ-UML ; ! "young"
פּאָפּולער:פּאָפּולער ADJ ; ! "popular"
שטאַרק:שטאַרק ADJ ; ! "strong"
שלעכט:ערג ADJ-IRREG-COMP ; ! "worse/worst"
שלעכט:שלעכט ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "bad"
שײן:שײן ADJ-UML ; ! "beautiful"
בּאַקאַנט:בּאַקאַנט ADJ-NO-COMP ; ! "well known" FIXME: CHECK NO-COMP?

LEXICON ProperNouns

אַמעריקע:אַמעריקע NP-TOP ; ! "America"
אײראָפּע:אײראָפּע NP-TOP ; ! "Europe"
דײַטשלאַנד:דײַטשלאַנד NP-TOP ; ! "Germany"
ירושלים:ירושלים NP-TOP ; ! "Jerusalem"
ישראל:ישראל NP-TOP ; ! "Israel"
ארץ% ישראל:ארץ% ישראל NP-TOP ; ! "Land of Israel"  ! FIXME: Maybe just N?
לאָס% אַנדזשעלעס:לאָס% אַנדזשעלעס NP-TOP ; ! "Los Angeles"
ניו% יאָרק:ניו% יאָרק NP-TOP ; ! "New York"
ניו% יאָרק:ניו%-יאָרק NP-TOP ; ! "New York" ! Dir/LR
ניו% יאָרק:ניו%־יאָרק NP-TOP ; ! "New York" ! Dir/LR
ענגלאַנד:ענגלאַנד NP-TOP ; ! "England"
קאַנאַדע:קאַנאַדע NP-TOP ; ! "Canada"
רוסלאַנד:רוסלאַנד NP-TOP ; ! "Russia"

אַבֿרהם:אַבֿרהם NP-ANT-M ; ! "Avrohem"
אהרן:אהרן NP-ANT-M ; ! "Arn"
דוד:דוד NP-ANT-M ; ! "Dovid"
יוסף:יוסף NP-ANT-M ; ! "Yo(y)sef"
יעקבֿ:יעקבֿ NP-ANT-M ; ! "Yankev"
יצחק:יצחק NP-ANT-M ; ! "Yitskhok"
ישראל:ישראל NP-ANT-M ; ! "Yisroel"
מאיר:מאיר NP-ANT-M ; ! "Meyer"
מנחם:מנחם NP-ANT-M ; ! "Menakhem"
מענדל:מענדל NP-ANT-M ; ! "Mendl"
משה:משה NP-ANT-M ; ! "Moyshe"
נחמן:נחמן NP-ANT-M ; ! "Nakhman"

LEXICON Titles

הרבֿ%<title%>:הרבֿ # ; ! "rabbi"
רב%<title%>:רב # ; ! "reb (mister)"
מרת%<title%>:מרת # ; ! "Mrs."

LEXICON Punctuation

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ; 
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%-%<guio%>:%-%- # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%−%<guio%>:%− # ; 
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;

LEXICON Numerals
אײנס:אײנס NUM ;  ! FIXME: counting 1
אײן:אײן NUM ;    ! FIXME: number one; also TODO: inflected forms of אײן
צװײ:צװײ NUM ;         ! "two"
דרײַ:דרײַ NUM ;         ! "three"
פֿיר:פֿיר NUM ;         ! "four"
פֿינף:פֿינף NUM ;       ! "five"
זעקס:זעקס NUM ;       ! "six"
זיבן:זיבן NUM ;       ! "seven"
אַכט:אַכט NUM ;         ! "eight"
נײַן:נײַן NUM ;         ! "nine"
צען:צען NUM ;         ! "ten"
עלף:עלף NUM ;         ! "eleven"
צװעלף:צװעלף NUM ;     ! "twelve"
דרײַצן:דרײַצן NUM ;     ! "thirteen"
פֿערצן:פֿערצן NUM ;     ! "fourteen"
פֿופֿצן:פֿופֿצן NUM ;     ! "fifteen"
זעכצן:זעכצן NUM ;     ! "sixteen"
זיבעצן:זיבעצן NUM ;   ! "seventeen"
אַכצן:אַכצן NUM ;       ! "eighteen"
נײַנצן:נײַנצן NUM ;     ! "nineteen"
צװאַנציק:צװאַנציק NUM ; ! "twenty"
דרײַסיק:דרײַסיק NUM ;   ! "thirty"
פֿערציק:פֿערציק NUM ;   ! "forty"
פֿופֿציק:פֿופֿציק NUM ;   ! "fifty"
זעכציק:זעכציק NUM ;   ! "sixty"
זיבעציק:זיבעציק NUM ; ! "seventy"
אַכציק:אַכציק NUM ;     ! "eighty"
נײַנציק:נײַנציק NUM ;   ! "ninety"
הונדערט:הונדערט NUM ; ! "hundred"
טויזנט:טויזנט NUM ;   ! "thousand"    ! FIXME: plural טױזנטער
מיליאָן:מיליאָן NUM ;   ! "million"     ! FIXME: plural מיליאָנען
אײנס:ערשט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
צװײ:צװײט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
דרײַ:דריט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
פֿיר:פֿערט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
פֿינף:פֿינפֿט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
זעקס:זעקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
זיבן:זיבעט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
אַכט:אַכט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
נײַן:נײַנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;
צען:צענט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;             ! "tenth"
עלף:עלפֿט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;             ! "eleventh"
צװעלף:צוועלפֿט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;        ! "twelfth"
דרײַצן:דרײַצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;         ! "thirteenth"
פֿערצן:פֿערצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;         ! "fourteenth"
פֿופֿצן:פֿופֿצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;         ! "fifteenth"
זעכצן:זעכצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;         ! "sixteenth"
זיבעצן:זיבעצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;       ! "seventeenth"
אַכצן:אַכצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;           ! "eighteenth"
נײַנצן:נײַנצנט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;         ! "nineteenth"
צװאַנציק:צװאַנציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;    ! "twentieth"
דרײַסיק:דרײַסיקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "thirtieth"
פֿערציק:פֿערציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "fortieth"
פֿופֿציק:פֿופֿציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "fiftieth"
זעכציק:זעכציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "sixtieth"
זיבעציק:זיבעציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;    ! "seventieth"
אַכציק:אַכציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;        ! "eightieth"
נײַנציק:נײַנציקסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "ninetieth"
הונדערט:הונדערטסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;    ! "hundredth"
טויזנט:טויזנטסט NUM-ORD-ADJ ;      ! "thousandth"
